Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-203
Insurance companies; lines of insurance; authorized.

Except as provided in section 44-1984, a company may be formed or an existing company may be authorized to transact any one or more of the lines of insurance specified in section 44-201.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 80, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 3217;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. V, § 3, p. 608;

C.S.1922, § 7816;

Laws 1925, c. 124, § 3, p. 329;

C.S.1929, § 44-403;

R.S.1943, § 44-203;

Laws 1951, c. 136, § 2, p. 560;

Laws 1971, LB 767, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 181, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 235, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 47.